Washington statutes.
RCW 2.76.020

Purposes. (Expires January 1, 2026.)

The purpose of the interbranch advisory committee is to foster cooperation, communication, coordination, collaboration, and planning regarding issues of mutual concern among the three branches of state government. An additional purpose of the committee is to suggest ways to provide access to justice and to court services in a just and equitable manner.

[ 2022 c 284 s 2.]